Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,153
Certificate of authority; suspension, revocation, or denial; grounds.

If the Director of Insurance finds that any of the conditions listed in this section exist, any certificate of authority issued under the Health Maintenance Organization Act may be suspended or revoked or any application for a certificate of authority may be denied:

(1) The health maintenance organization is operating significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document or in a manner contrary to that described in any other information submitted under section 44-32,117 unless amendments to such submissions have been filed with and approved by the director;

(2) The health maintenance organization issues an evidence of coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services which does not comply with the requirements of sections 44-32,129 to 44-32,133 and 44-32,149;

(3) The health maintenance organization does not provide or arrange for basic health care services;

(4) The Department of Health and Human Services certifies to the Director of Insurance that:

(a) The health maintenance organization does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of section 44-32,119; or

(b) The health maintenance organization is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care services;

(5) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;

(6) The health maintenance organization has failed to correct, within the time prescribed by section 44-32,154, any deficiency occurring due to such health maintenance organization's prescribed minimum net worth being impaired;

(7) The health maintenance organization has failed to implement grievance procedures in a reasonable manner to resolve valid complaints;

(8) The health maintenance organization or any person on its behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue, misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive, or unfair manner;

(9) The continued operation of the health maintenance organization would be hazardous to its enrollees; or

(10) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed substantially to comply with the act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 62;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 252;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 191.